Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Termination of Parental Rights
Trial court properly terminated a mother's parental rights to her children pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(v) because the children had been in foster care for 15 of the most recent 22 months, and she continuously put them in dangerous situations and placed the wants and desires of her ex-husband and boyfriends ahead of their welfare; she also participated in the sexual abuse of one child. NLT v. State (In re KAT), 2012 WY 150, 288 P.3d 1217,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence sufficient to sustain termination of parental rights
under paragraph (a)(i). —

District court
properly terminated a father's parental rights because the child
was
left in the care of the mother for nearly all of his life, the
father
made no provision for the child's support for four years,
none of
his contacts were directed to the child, but rather were
addressed
specifically to the mother and revolved around an effort
to form some
sort of a relationship with her, and although one e-mail
mentioned
that the father loved the child, it was not a communication
toward
the child, and the statute did not require that the mother
pursue
lesser options before seeking termination. Johnson v. Calkins, 2017 WY 50, 393 P.3d 1316,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2017).

Evidence was sufficient to support termination of a father's parental rights where the children's mother proved by clear and convincing evidence that the father was incarcerated due to a felony conviction and was manifestly unfit to have custody of any child. DKM v. RJS (In re SYM), 924 P.2d 985,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1996).

Proof that the mother and father were incarcerated on felony charges relating to the endangerment of the children, evidence of their past parenting failures, and indications that their parenting skills had not improved supported the district court's termination of their parental rights for unfitness pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(iv).
JD v. State (In re AE), 2009 WY 78, 208 P.3d 1323,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence sufficient to sustain termination of parental rights under paragraphs (a)(v). —

District court properly found there was clear and convincing evidence that appellant mother's parental rights be terminated under this section for unfitness, because the mother had a history of drug use, the children had low weights for their age, and the youngest child had a serious medical condition that required close monitoring. The children's health improved in foster care.
TMC v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re ARC), 2011 WY 119, 258 P.3d 704,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2011).

District court's determination that appellant, who had been incarcerated for nearly 20 years of his life, was unfit to have custody and control of his child was supported by clear and convincing evidence; accordingly, there was sufficient evidence to support termination of appellant's parental rights under subsection (a)(v) of this section. RGS v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re KGS), 2017 WY 2, 386 P.3d 1144,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2017).

Termination of the mother’s parental rights was proper because the children were in foster care under the responsibility of the State for 50 months at the time of trial; the record was replete with evidence that the mother was unable to meet the needs of the children at the time of trial even during short visits, whether supervised or unsupervised; she tacitly admitted that she was unfit to have custody by arguing that she would have gained fitness at some time in the future if the termination had not occurred; and the mother’s claim that she might improve in the future and become fit to have custody and control of the children was irrelevant to the elements of this section. Swenson v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re: LCH), 2019 WY 13, 434 P.3d 100,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2019).

Clear and convincing evidence established that parents were unfit to have custody and control of their child because of the parents’ mental health diagnoses, history of substance abuse, drug-related criminal activity, inconsistent visitation, inconsistent housing, and failure to apply for services and benefits. Termination was also in the child’s best interest because the child had been placed out of the home and the court had no clear indication of when, if ever, the parents would have been sufficiently rehabilitated. Hood v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re JPL), 2021 WY 94, 493 P.3d 174,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2021).

Trial court's
determination of the mother's unfitness was supported by evidence
that the mother exhibited a clear pattern of neglect adversely affected,
and even injuring, the children, that such reckless and dangerous
behavior resulted from the mother's drug and/or alcohol abuse, and
that the mother paced the mental emotional needs of the children
at
risk; SAS v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AGS), 2014 WY 143, 337 P.3d 470,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

WR v. Natrona County Dep't of Family Servs., 916 P.2d 991,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1996).

Stated

in

Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Jan 24, 2014).

Quoted

in

In re CH, 783 P.2d 155,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1989); Jet v. State (In re Drt), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 21, 2010); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013).

Cited

in

State ex rel. TRL v. RLP, 772 P.2d 1054,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1989); DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Termination of Parental Rights: Establishing Standards for the Wyoming Law, In the Matter of Parental Rights to X, Y and Z, DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980),” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 295 (1981).

For comment “Wyoming's New Termination of Parental Rights Statute,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 621 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Legal malpractice in defense of parents at proceedings to terminate parental rights over dependent or neglected children, 18 ALR5th 902.

Parent's use of drugs as factor in award of custody of children, visitation rights, or termination of parental rights, 20 ALR5th 534.

Smoking as factor in child custody and visitation cases, 36 ALR5th 377.

Sufficiency of evidence to establish parent's knowledge or allowance of child's sexual abuse by another under statute permitting termination of parental rights for “allowing” or “knowingly allowing” such abuse to occur, 53 ALR5th 499.

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

Natural parent's indigence resulting from unemployment or underemployment as precluding finding that failure to support child waived requirement of consent to adoption, 83 ALR5th 375.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Constitutional issues, 110 ALR5th 579.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — General considerations, 113 ALR5th 349.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Effect on parenting ability and parental rights, 116 ALR5th 559.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Best interests analysis, 117 ALR5th 349.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Issues concerning guardian ad litem and counsel,
118 ALR 5th 561.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Applicability of Americans With Disabilities Act,
119 ALR 5th 351.

Parents' mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Evidentiary issues, 122 A.L.R.5th 385.